Utah statutes.
78B-3-416.   Division to provide panel -- Exemption -- Procedures -- Statute
of limitations tolled -- Composition of panel -- Expenses -- Division
authorized to set license fees.
(1) (a)  The division shall provide a hearing panel in alleged medical
liability cases against health care providers as defined in Section 78B-3-403,
except dentists.
(b) (i)  The division shall establish procedures for prelitigation
consideration of medical liability claims for damages arising out of the
provision of or alleged failure to provide health care.
(ii)  The division may establish rules necessary to administer the process and
procedures related to prelitigation hearings and the conduct of prelitigation
hearings in accordance with Sections 78B-3-416 through 78B-3-420.
(c)  The proceedings are informal, nonbinding, and are not subject to Title
63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, but are compulsory as a
condition precedent to commencing litigation.
(d)  Proceedings conducted under authority of this section are confidential,
privileged, and immune from civil process.
(2) (a)  The party initiating a medical liability action shall file a request
for prelitigation panel review with the division within 60 days after the
service of a statutory notice of intent to commence action under Section
78B-3-412.
(b)  The request shall include a copy of the notice of intent to commence
action.  The request shall be mailed to all health care providers named in the
notice and request.
(3) (a)  The filing of a request for prelitigation panel review under this
section tolls the applicable statute of limitations until the earlier of 60
days following the division's issuance of an opinion by the prelitigation
panel, or 60 days following the termination of jurisdiction by the division as
provided in this subsection.  The division shall send any opinion issued by
the panel to all parties by regular mail.
(b) (i)  The division shall complete a prelitigation hearing under this
section within 180 days after the filing of the request for prelitigation
panel review, or within any longer period as agreed upon in writing by all
parties to the review.
(ii)  If the prelitigation hearing has not been completed within the time
limits established in Subsection (3)(b)(i), the division has no further
jurisdiction over the matter subject to review and the claimant is considered
to have complied with all conditions precedent required under this section
prior to the commencement of litigation.
(c) (i)  The claimant and any respondent may agree by written stipulation that
no useful purpose would be served by convening a prelitigation panel under
this section.
(ii)  When the stipulation is filed with the division, the division shall
within 10 days after receipt enter an order divesting itself of jurisdiction
over the claim, as it concerns the stipulating respondent, and stating that
the claimant has complied with all conditions precedent to the commencement of
litigation regarding the claim.
(4)  The division shall provide for and appoint an appropriate panel or panels
to hear complaints of medical liability and damages, made by or on behalf of
any patient who is an alleged victim of medical liability.  The panels are
composed of:
(a)  one member who is a resident lawyer currently licensed and in good
standing to practice law in this state and who shall serve as chairman of the
panel, who is appointed by the division from among qualified individuals who
have registered with the division indicating a willingness to serve as panel
members, and a willingness to comply with the rules of professional conduct
governing lawyers in the state of Utah, and who has completed division
training regarding conduct of panel hearings;
(b) (i)  one member who is a licensed health care provider listed under
Section 78B-3-403, who is practicing and knowledgeable in the same specialty
as the proposed defendant, and who is appointed by the division in accordance
with Subsection (5); or
(ii)  in claims against only hospitals or their employees, one member who is
an individual currently serving in a hospital administration position directly
related to hospital operations or conduct that includes responsibility for the
area of practice that is the subject of the liability claim, and who is
appointed by the division; and
(c)  a lay panelist who is not a lawyer, doctor, hospital employee, or other
health care provider, and who is a responsible citizen of the state, selected
and appointed by the division from among individuals who have completed
division training with respect to panel hearings.
(5) (a)  Each person listed as a health care provider in Section 78B-3-403 and
practicing under a license issued by the state, is obligated as a condition of
holding that license to participate as a member of a medical liability
prelitigation panel at reasonable times, places, and intervals, upon issuance,
with advance notice given in a reasonable time frame, by the division of an
Order to Participate as a Medical Liability Prelitigation Panel Member.
(b)  A licensee may be excused from appearance and participation as a panel
member upon the division finding participation by the licensee will create an
unreasonable burden or hardship upon the licensee.
(c)  A licensee whom the division finds failed to appear and participate as a
panel member when so ordered, without adequate explanation or justification
and without being excused for cause by the division, may be assessed an
administrative fine not to exceed $5,000.
(d)  A licensee whom the division finds intentionally or repeatedly failed to
appear and participate as a panel member when so ordered, without adequate
explanation or justification and without being excused for cause by the
division, may be assessed an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000, and is
guilty of unprofessional conduct.
(e)  All fines collected under Subsections (5)(c) and (d) shall be deposited
in the Physicians Education Fund created in Section 58-67a-1.
(6)  Each person selected as a panel member shall certify, under oath, that he
has no bias or conflict of interest with respect to any matter under
consideration.
(7)  Members of the prelitigation hearing panels shall receive per diem
compensation and travel expenses for attending panel hearings as established
by rules of the division.
(8) (a)  In addition to the actual cost of administering the licensure of
health care providers, the division may set license fees of health care
providers within the limits established by law equal to their proportionate
costs of administering prelitigation panels.
(b)  The claimant bears none of the costs of administering the prelitigation
panel except under Section 78B-3-420.
